Hawaii statutes.
[§486-133] Requirement for measuremaster
license; duties; prohibitions. Any person who engages in public weighing
shall be licensed as a public measuremaster and shall perform the duties as
specified by rule of the board. Any person who is not licensed as a public
measuremaster is prohibited from assuming the title of public measuremaster and
is prohibited from performing the acts or duties of a public measuremaster. [L
1991, c 153, pt of §7]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next